Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.19, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.19. As used in Sections 1289.20 through 1289.22 of


this title and Section 2 of this act Section 1289.26 of this title:


1. “Restricted bullet” means a round or elongated missile with


a core of less than sixty percent (60%) lead and having a


fluorocarbon coating, which is designed to travel at a high velocity


and is capable of penetrating body armor; and



Req. No. 2286 Page 1


2. “Body armor” means a vest or shirt of ten (10) plies or more


of bullet resistant material as defined by the Office of


Development, Testing and Dissemination, a division of the United


States Department of Justice personal protective body covering


intended to protect against gunfire;


2. “Restricted bullet” means a round or elongated missile with


a core of less than sixty percent (60%) lead and having a


fluorocarbon coating, which is designed to travel at a high velocity


and is capable of penetrating body armor; and


3. “Restricted weapon” means any firearm that is capable of


shooting more than one round automatically, without manual


reloading, by a single function of the trigger. The term includes


devices that convert ordinary firearms or semiautomatic firearms


into fully automatic firearms, and includes, but is not limited to,


Glock switches or auto sears, but does not include bump stocks.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.20, as


amended by Section 133, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1289.20) is amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.20.


MANUFACTURE OF RESTRICTED BULLETS AND WEAPONS


A. Except for the purpose of public safety or national


security, it shall be unlawful to manufacture, cause to be


manufactured, import, advertise for sale, or sell within this state



Req. No. 2286 Page 2


any restricted bullet or restricted weapon as defined in Section


1289.19 of this title.


B. Any person convicted of violating subsection A of this


section shall be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense and shall be


punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)


nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by imprisonment


in the State Penitentiary custody of the Department of Corrections


for not more than ten (10) years, or by both such fine and


imprisonment.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.21, as


amended by Section 134, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1289.21) is amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.21.


POSSESSION OR USE OF RESTRICTED BULLETS AND WEAPONS


A. It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, carry upon


his or her person, use, or attempt to use against another person any


restricted bullet or restricted weapon as defined in Section 1289.19


of this title.


B. Any person convicted of violating subsection A of this


section shall be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense and shall be


punished by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary custody of the


Department of Corrections for not less than two (2) years nor more


than ten (10) years. The sentence so imposed shall not be


suspended.

Req. No. 2286 Page 3


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2286 CN 1/8/2026 1:57:26 PM











































Req. No. 2286 Page 4